tr: Folyo perde montaj yöntemi: Yapışkanlı bantlar dahil; Fon standıyla uyumlu (sabitleyici dahil değildir); Klipsli; Halka delikleri/kuşgözü; Kancalar dahil; Çubuk cebi; Kendinden yapışkanlı üst şerit; Bağcıklı; Diğer
sv: Monteringsmetod för foliegardiner: Självhäftande flikar ingår; Kompatibel med bakgrundsstativ (inga fästen ingår); Klämma; Öljetter; Krokar ingår; Kanal; Självhäftande överkant; Knytband; Övrigt
th: วิธีการติดตั้งม่านฟอยล์: มีแถบกาวมาให้; รองรับขาตั้งฉากหลัง (ไม่มีตัวยึดติดมาให้); แบบหนีบ; รูตาไก่; มีตะขอมาให้; ช่องสอดราวม่าน; แถบกาวด้านบน; เชือกผูก; อื่นๆ
nl: Foliegordijn bevestigingsmethode: Inclusief plakstrips; Compatibel met achtergrondstandaard (geen bevestigingsmiddelen inbegrepen); Klembevestiging; Zeilringen/oogjes; Inclusief haken; Tunnel; Zelfklevende bovenstrip; Strikbandjes; Overige
fr: Mode de montage du rideau métallisé: Languettes adhésives incluses; Compatible avec les supports de toile de fond (aucune fixation incluse); À clipser; Œillets; Crochets inclus; Passe-tringle; Bande supérieure autocollante; Attaches à nouer; Autre
bg-BG: Метод за монтаж на фолиева завеса: Включени залепващи ленти; Съвместима със стойка за фон (без включени крепежни елементи); С щипки; Капси/отвори; Включени куки; Джоб за корниз; Самозалепваща се горна лента; Връзки; Друг
zh-CN: 箔帘安装方法: 内含背胶贴片; 兼容背景支架（不含紧固件）; 夹扣式; 索环/锁眼; 包含挂钩; 穿杆口袋; 自粘顶部条; 绑带; 其他
sl-SI: Način montaže folijske zavese: Vključeni samolepilni zavihki; Združljivo s stojalom za ozadja (brez pritrdilnih elementov); Na zatič; Kovinska ušesca/obročki; Vključene kljuke; Žep za palico; Samolepilni zgornji trak; Vrvice za zavezovanje; Drugo
de: Montageart des Folienvorhangs: Inklusive Klebepads; Kompatibel mit Hintergrundständer (keine Befestigungen enthalten); Mit Clips; Ösen; Inklusive Haken; Tunnelzug; Selbstklebender Streifen oben; Bindeschnüre; Sonstiges
ko: 호일 커튼 설치 방법: 접착 탭 포함; 백드롭 스탠드 호환(패스너 미포함); 클립온; 그로밋/아일릿; 후크 포함; 로드 포켓; 상단 자체 접착 스트립; 끈 묶기; 기타
hr-HR: Način montaže folijske zavjese: Uključene ljepljive trake; Kompatibilno sa stalkom za pozadinu (bez pričvršćivača); Na kopču; Otvor s prstenom / ušice; Uključene kuke; Džep za štap; Samoljepljiva gornja traka; Vrpce za vezanje; Ostalo
ja: フォイルカーテンの取り付け方法: 粘着タブ付属; バックドロップスタンド対応 (留め具なし); クリップオン; グロメット/アイレット; フック付属; ロッドポケット; 粘着テープ付き上部ストリップ; 紐留め; その他
el: Μέθοδος τοποθέτησης μεταλλιζέ κουρτίνας: Περιλαμβάνονται αυτοκόλλητες γλωττίδες; Συμβατό με βάση φόντου (δεν περιλαμβάνονται στοιχεία στερέωσης); Με κλιπ; Κρίκοι/οπές; Περιλαμβάνονται γάντζοι; Θήκη για ράβδο; Αυτοκόλλητη άνω λωρίδα; Δεσίματα με κορδόνι; Άλλο
cs: Způsob montáže party závěsu: Včetně lepicích štítků; Kompatibilní se stojanem na pozadí (bez upevňovacích prvků); Na klip; Průchodky/očka; Včetně háčků; Tunýlek na tyč; Samolepicí horní páska; Šňůrky na zavázání; Ostatní
hu: Fóliafüggöny rögzítési módja: Öntapadós fülekkel; Háttérállvány-kompatibilis (rögzítők nélkül); Csíptetős; Ringlik / fűzőlyukak; Akasztókkal; Rúdbújtatós; Öntapadós felső csík; Kötözőszalagok; Egyéb
es: Método de montaje de cortinas de aluminio: Pestañas adhesivas incluidas; Compatible con soporte de telón de fondo (no incluye fijaciones); Enganchable; Ojales; Ganchos incluidos; Bolsillo para barra; Tira superior autoadhesiva; Cordones de amarre; Otro
pl: Sposób montażu kurtyny foliowej: Paski samoprzylepne w zestawie; Kompatybilne ze stojakiem na tło (brak elementów mocujących w zestawie); Na klipsy; Przelotki / oczka; Haczyki w zestawie; Tunel na karnisz; Samoprzylepny pasek górny; Wiązania sznurkowe; Inny
vi: Phương pháp lắp đặt màn lá kim loại: Kèm miếng dán; Tương thích chân đế phông nền (không kèm khóa gắn); Dạng kẹp; Lỗ khoen; Kèm móc; Lỗ luồn rèm; Băng keo dán sẵn ở mép trên; Dây buộc; Khác
sk-SK: Metóda montáže fóliovej clony: Vrátane lepiacich pások; Kompatibilné so stojanom na pozadie (bez upevňovacích prvkov); Pripínacie; Očká/priechodky; Vrátane háčikov; Tunel na tyč; Samolepiaci horný pásik; Šnúrky na zaviazanie; Iné
nb: Monteringsmetode for foliegardiner: Selvklebende lapper inkludert; Kompatibel med bakgrunnsstativ (ingen fester inkludert); Klipsfeste; Maljer; Kroker inkludert; Stanglomme; Selvklebende remse øverst; Knytesnorer; Annet
en: Foil curtain mounting method: Adhesive tabs included; Backdrop stand compatible (no fasteners included); Clip-on; Grommets/eyelets; Hooks included; Rod pocket; Self-adhesive top strip; String ties; Other
pt-BR: Método de montagem de cortina de folha metálica: Abas adesivas incluídas; Compatível com suporte de pano de fundo (sem fixadores incluídos); Encaixe (clip-on); Ilhós; Ganchos incluídos; Bolso para varão; Tira superior autoadesiva; Tiras de amarrar; Outro
pt-PT: Método de montagem de cortina de folha: Tiras adesivas incluídas; Compatível com suporte de fundo (sem fixadores incluídos); De mola; Ilhós; Ganchos incluídos; Bolso para varão; Tira superior autocolante; Atilhos; Outro
zh-TW: 金屬箔簾安裝方式: 隨附黏貼片; 相容背景支架 (未隨附緊固件); 夾式; 金屬孔眼; 隨附掛勾; 穿桿式; 自黏式頂部膠條; 綁帶; 其他
it: Metodo di montaggio della tenda di alluminio: Linguette adesive incluse; Compatibile con supporto per fondale (elementi di fissaggio non inclusi); A clip; Passacavi/occhielli; Ganci inclusi; Tasca per bastone; Striscia superiore autoadesiva; Lacci in cordino; Altro
fi: Folioverhon kiinnitysmenetelmä: Sisältää tarrat; Yhteensopiva taustatelineen kanssa (ei sisällä kiinnikkeitä); Klipsikiinnitys; Läpivientirenkaat/sirkat; Sisältää koukut; Kujamalli; Liimattava yläreuna; Nauhakiinnitys; Muu
ru: Способ крепления занавеса из фольги: Клейкие ленты в комплекте; Подходит для стоек для фона (без креплений в комплекте); На зажимах; Люверсы/кольца; Крючки в комплекте; Кулиска для карниза; Самоклеящаяся верхняя полоса; Завязки; Другое
da: Metode til montering af folieforhæng: Inklusive selvklæbende lapper; Kompatibel med baggrundsstativ (fastgørelseselementer medfølger ikke); Clip-on; Snøreringe/øskner; Inklusive kroge; Løbegang; Selvklæbende topstrimmel; Bindebånd; Andet
lt-LT: Folijos užuolaidos tvirtinimo būdas: Pridėti lipnūs lapeliai; Suderinama su fono stovu (tvirtinimo detalių nepridedama); Užsegamas spaustukais; Žiedeliai / akutės; Pridėti kabliukai; Kišenė karnizui; Lipni viršutinė juosta; Raišteliai; Kita
ro-RO: Metoda de montare a perdelei de folie: Benzi adezive incluse; Compatibil cu suportul pentru fundal (fără elemente de fixare incluse); Cu clemă; Inele/capse; Cârlige incluse; Canal pentru galerie; Bandă adezivă superioară; Șnururi de legare; Altele